Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko S.F. _____ H.F. _____ Section 1. GOALS AND ACCOUNTABILITY ââ ECONOMIC 1 DEVELOPMENT. 2 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the goals 3 for the economic development authority shall be to expand and 4 stimulate the state economy, increase the wealth of Iowans, and 5 increase the population of the state. 6 2. To achieve the goals in subsection 1, the economic 7 development authority shall do all of the following for the 8 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025: 9 a. Concentrate its efforts on programs and activities that 10 result in commercially viable products and services. 11 b. Adopt practices and services consistent with free 12 market, private sector philosophies. 13 c. Ensure economic growth and development throughout the 14 state. 15 d. Work with businesses and communities to continually 16 improve the economic development climate along with the 17 economic well-being and quality of life for Iowans. 18 e. Coordinate with other state agencies to ensure that they 19 are attentive to the needs of an entrepreneurial culture. 20 f. Establish a strong and aggressive marketing image to 21 showcase Iowaâs workforce, existing industry, and potential. 22 A priority shall be placed on recruiting new businesses, 23 business expansion, and retaining existing Iowa businesses. 24 Emphasis shall be placed on entrepreneurial development through 25 helping entrepreneurs secure capital, and developing networks 26 and a business climate conducive to entrepreneurs and small 27 businesses. 28 g. Encourage the development of communities and quality of 29 life to foster economic growth. 30 h. Prepare communities for future growth and development 31 through development, expansion, and modernization of 32 infrastructure. 33 i. Develop public-private partnerships with Iowa businesses 34 in the tourism industry, Iowa tour groups, Iowa tourism 35 -1- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 1/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ organizations, and political subdivisions in this state to 1 assist in the development of advertising efforts. 2 Sec. 2. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY. 3 1. APPROPRIATION 4 a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 5 to the economic development authority for the fiscal year 6 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 7 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 8 purposes designated in this subsection: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,999,646 10 b. (1) For salaries, support, miscellaneous purposes, 11 programs, marketing, administration, business development, 12 community development, small business development, and any 13 divisions the authority may organize. 14 (2) For business development operations and programs, 15 international trade, export assistance, workforce recruitment, 16 and the partner state program. 17 (3) For transfer to a fund created pursuant to section 18 15.313 for purposes of financing strategic infrastructure 19 projects. 20 (4) For community economic development programs, tourism 21 operations, community assistance, and the community development 22 block grant. 23 (5) For achieving the goals and accountability, and 24 fulfilling the requirements and duties required under this Act. 25 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 26 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 27 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 28 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in this 29 subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 30 2. FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE RESTRICTIONS 31 a. A business creating jobs through moneys appropriated in 32 subsection 1 shall be subject to contract provisions requiring 33 new and retained jobs to be filled by individuals who are 34 citizens of the United States who reside within the United 35 -2- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 2/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ States, or any person authorized to work in the United States 1 pursuant to federal law, including legal resident aliens 2 residing in the United States. 3 b. Any vendor who receives moneys appropriated in 4 subsection 1 shall adhere to such contract provisions and 5 provide periodic assurances as the state shall require that the 6 jobs are filled solely by citizens of the United States who 7 reside within the United States, or any person authorized to 8 work in the United States, pursuant to federal law, including 9 legal resident aliens residing in the United States. 10 c. A business that receives financial assistance from 11 the authority from moneys appropriated in subsection 1 shall 12 only employ individuals legally authorized to work in this 13 state. In addition to all other applicable penalties provided 14 by current law, all or a portion of the assistance received 15 by a business which is found to knowingly employ individuals 16 not legally authorized to work in this state is subject to 17 recapture by the authority. 18 3. USES OF APPROPRIATIONS 19 a. From the moneys appropriated in subsection 1, the 20 authority may support local workforce recruitment efforts 21 designed to recruit former citizens of the state and former 22 students at colleges and universities in the state to meet the 23 needs of local employers. 24 b. From the moneys appropriated in subsection 1, the 25 authority may provide financial assistance to early stage 26 industry companies being established by women entrepreneurs. 27 c. From the moneys appropriated in subsection 1, the 28 authority may provide financial assistance in the form of 29 grants, loans, or forgivable loans for advanced research and 30 commercialization projects involving value-added agriculture, 31 advanced technology, or biotechnology. 32 d. The authority shall not use any moneys appropriated in 33 subsection 1 for purposes of providing financial assistance 34 for any program or project that involves the installation of 35 -3- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 3/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ geothermal systems for melting snow and ice from streets or 1 sidewalks. 2 4. WORLD FOOD PRIZE 3 There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the economic development authority for the fiscal year 5 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 6 amount for the world food prize: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 8 5. TOURISM OFFICE 9 a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 10 to the economic development authority for the fiscal year 11 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 12 amount for the tourism office to be used for advertising, 13 promoting, placement, and implementation of the economic 14 development authorityâs strategic plan for tourism and travel: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,100,000 16 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 17 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 18 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 19 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 20 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 21 6. ARTS AND CULTURE ENHANCEMENT 22 a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 23 to the economic development authority for the fiscal year 24 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 25 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 26 purposes designated: 27 For planning and programming for the Iowa arts council: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,227,724 29 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 30 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 31 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 32 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 33 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 34 Sec. 3. LIMITATIONS OF STANDING APPROPRIATIONS ââ FY 35 -4- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 4/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2025-2026. Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the 1 following designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 2 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from 3 the general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 4 following purposes shall not exceed the following amount: 5 For the purposes of tourism marketing under section 99F.11, 6 subsection 4 , paragraph âdâ, subparagraph (2): 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,443,700 8 Sec. 4. FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE REPORTING ââ ECONOMIC 9 DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY. The economic development authority 10 shall submit an annual report to the general assembly no later 11 than November 1, 2025, that details the amount of every direct 12 loan, forgivable loan, tax credit, tax exemption, tax refund, 13 grant, or any other financial assistance awarded to a person 14 during the prior fiscal year by the authority under an economic 15 development program administered by the authority. The report 16 shall identify the county where the project associated with 17 each such award is located. 18 Sec. 5. INSURANCE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. From the moneys 19 collected by the insurance division of the department of 20 insurance and financial services in excess of the anticipated 21 gross revenues under section 505.7, subsection 3 , during 22 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, $100,000 shall be 23 transferred to the economic development authority for insurance 24 economic development and international insurance economic 25 development. 26 Sec. 6. IOWA FINANCE AUTHORITY. 27 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 28 to the Iowa finance authority for the fiscal year beginning 29 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, 30 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 31 designated: 32 a. Rent subsidy program 33 (1) To provide reimbursement for rent expenses to eligible 34 persons under the home and community-based services rent 35 -5- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 5/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ subsidy program established in section 16.55: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 873,000 2 (2) Of the moneys appropriated in this paragraph, not more 3 than $35,000 may be used for administrative costs. 4 b. Housing renewal pilot program 5 To provide housing renewal moneys to a nonprofit Iowa 6 affiliate to award grants to eligible communities for a housing 7 renewal pilot program: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 550,000 9 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 10 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 11 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 12 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 13 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 14 Sec. 7. IOWA FINANCE AUTHORITY AUDIT. The auditor of state 15 is requested to review the audit of the Iowa finance authority 16 performed by the auditor hired by the authority. 17 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. There 18 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 19 department of workforce development for the fiscal year 20 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 21 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 22 purposes designated: 23 1. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT OPERATIONS 24 a. For the operation of field offices and the workforce 25 development board: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,902,636 27 b. Of the moneys appropriated in paragraph âaâ, the 28 department shall allocate $150,000 to the state library for the 29 purpose of licensing an online resource which prepares persons 30 to succeed in the workplace through programs which improve job 31 skills and vocational test-taking abilities. 32 2. OFFENDER REENTRY PROGRAM 33 a. For the development and administration of an offender 34 reentry program to provide offenders with employment skills: 35 -6- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 6/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 393,424 1 b. The department of workforce development shall partner 2 with the department of corrections to provide staff within 3 the correctional facilities resources to improve offendersâ 4 abilities to find and retain productive employment. 5 3. INTEGRATED INFORMATION FOR IOWA SYSTEM 6 For the payment of services provided by the department of 7 administrative services related to the integrated information 8 for Iowa system: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 228,822 10 4. WORKPLACE INJURY AND SAFETY SURVEYS 11 For the operation of workplace safety surveys and workplace 12 data collection and analysis, including salaries, support, 13 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 127,314 15 5. SUMMER YOUTH INTERN PILOT PROGRAM 16 For the funding of a summer youth intern pilot program that 17 helps young people at risk of not graduating from high school 18 to explore and prepare for high-demand careers through summer 19 work experience, including the development of soft skills: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 21 6. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION SERVICES DIVISION 22 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 23 purposes: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,308,429 25 For purposes of optimizing the job placement of individuals 26 with disabilities, the division shall make its best efforts 27 to work with community rehabilitation program providers for 28 job placement and retention services for individuals with 29 significant disabilities and most significant disabilities. By 30 January 15, 2026, the division shall submit a written report to 31 the general assembly regarding the divisionâs outreach efforts 32 with community rehabilitation program providers. 33 b. For matching moneys for programs to enable persons 34 with severe physical or mental disabilities to function more 35 -7- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 7/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ independently, including salaries and support: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 84,804 2 c. For the entrepreneurs with disabilities program 3 established pursuant to section 84H.4: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 143,297 5 d. For costs associated with centers for independent 6 living: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 86,547 8 7. ADULT EDUCATION AND LITERACY PROGRAMS 9 For distribution as grants for the purpose of adult basic 10 education programs for students requiring instruction in 11 English as a second language: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 500,000 13 In issuing grants under this subsection, the department 14 of workforce development shall use the same criteria as is 15 used for purposes of awarding grants for the purpose of adult 16 basic education programs for students requiring instruction in 17 English as a second language using moneys that are appropriated 18 to the department from the Iowa skilled worker and job creation 19 fund created in section 8.57J. 20 8. REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP DEVELOPMENT PROGRAMS 21 For the funding of the registered apprenticeship development 22 programs under chapter 84F to encourage small to midsize 23 businesses to start or grow registered apprenticeships: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 760,000 25 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in this 26 section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of 27 the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 28 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of the 29 succeeding fiscal year. 30 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT ââ EMPLOYEE 31 MISCLASSIFICATION PROGRAM. There is appropriated from the 32 general fund of the state to the department of workforce 33 development for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 34 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 35 -8- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 8/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1 For enhancing efforts to investigate employers that 2 misclassify workers: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 382,685 4 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT ââ SPECIAL 5 EMPLOYMENT SECURITY CONTINGENCY FUND. 6 1. There is appropriated from the special employment 7 security contingency fund created in section 96.13 to the 8 department of workforce development for the fiscal year 9 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 10 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for 11 field offices: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,616,084 13 2. Any remaining additional penalty and interest revenue 14 collected by the department of workforce development is 15 appropriated to the department for the fiscal year beginning 16 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, to accomplish the 17 mission of the department. 18 Sec. 11. IOWA SKILLED WORKER AND JOB CREATION FUND. 19 1. There is appropriated from the Iowa skilled worker and 20 job creation fund created in section 8.57J to the following 21 departments, agencies, and institutions for the fiscal year 22 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 23 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 24 purposes designated: 25 a. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 26 (1) For the purposes of providing assistance as described 27 in section 15.335B : 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,700,000 29 (a) From the moneys appropriated in this subparagraph 30 (1), the economic development authority may use not more than 31 $1,000,000 for purposes of providing infrastructure grants to 32 main street communities under the main street Iowa program. 33 (b) As a condition of receiving moneys appropriated in this 34 subparagraph (1), an entity shall testify upon the request of 35 -9- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 9/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the joint appropriations subcommittee on economic development 1 regarding the expenditure of such moneys. 2 (2) For support of the manufacturing 4.0 technology 3 investment program established in section 15.371: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,016,675 5 (3) For the empower rural Iowa initiative pursuant to 6 Executive Order 3, dated July 18, 2018: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 700,000 8 b. STATE BOARD OF REGENTS INSTITUTIONS 9 (1) IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY. For 10 small business development centers, the research park, and the 11 center for industrial research and service: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,424,302 13 (a) Of the moneys appropriated in this subparagraph (1), 14 Iowa state university of science and technology shall allocate 15 at least $735,728 for purposes of funding small business 16 development centers. Iowa state university of science and 17 technology may allocate the appropriated moneys to the various 18 small business development centers in any manner necessary to 19 achieve the purposes of this subparagraph. 20 (b) Iowa state university of science and technology shall 21 do all of the following: 22 (i) Direct expenditures for research toward projects that 23 will provide economic stimulus for Iowa. 24 (ii) Provide emphasis to providing services to Iowa-based 25 companies. 26 (c) It is the intent of the general assembly that the 27 industrial incentive program focus on Iowa industrial sectors 28 and seek contributions and in-kind donations from businesses, 29 industrial foundations, and trade associations, and that moneys 30 for the center for industrial research and service industrial 31 incentive program shall be allocated only for projects which 32 are matched by private sector moneys for directed contract 33 research or for nondirected research. The match required of 34 small businesses as defined in section 15.102 for directed 35 -10- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 10/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ contract research or for nondirected research shall be $1 1 for each $3 of state funds. The match required for other 2 businesses for directed contract research or for nondirected 3 research shall be $1 for each $1 of state funds. The match 4 required of industrial foundations or trade associations shall 5 be $1 for each $1 of state funds. 6 (d) Iowa state university of science and technology shall 7 report annually to the general assembly the total amount of 8 private contributions, the proportion of contributions from 9 small businesses and other businesses, and the proportion for 10 directed contract research and nondirected research of benefit 11 to Iowa businesses and industrial sectors. 12 (2) STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 13 (a) For the state university of Iowa research park and for 14 university of Iowa pharmaceuticals located at the research 15 park, including salaries, support, maintenance, equipment, and 16 miscellaneous purposes: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 209,279 18 The state university of Iowa shall do all of the following: 19 (i) Direct expenditures for research toward projects that 20 will provide economic stimulus for Iowa. 21 (ii) Provide emphasis to providing services to Iowa-based 22 companies. 23 (b) For the purpose of implementing the entrepreneurship 24 and economic growth initiative: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 26 (3) UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA 27 (a) For the metal casting and foundry 4.0 centers, 28 advance Iowa, family business center, and the institute for 29 decision making, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 30 miscellaneous purposes: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,466,419 32 The university of northern Iowa shall do all of the 33 following: 34 (i) Direct expenditures for research toward projects that 35 -11- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 11/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ will provide economic stimulus for Iowa. 1 (ii) Provide emphasis to providing services to Iowa-based 2 companies. 3 (b) For the university of northern Iowa to offer 4 undergraduate students from the states contiguous to Iowa the 5 same rate of tuition and mandatory fees that are charged to 6 undergraduate resident students: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,000,000 8 (4) CONDITIONS. As a condition of receiving moneys 9 appropriated in this lettered paragraph âbâ, an entity 10 shall testify upon the request of the joint appropriations 11 subcommittee on economic development regarding the expenditure 12 of such moneys. 13 c. DEPARTMENT OF WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT 14 (1) For staffing costs related to completing workforce 15 preparation outcome reporting in conjunction with the 16 department of education: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 18 (2) For distribution to community colleges for the purposes 19 of implementing adult education and literacy programs pursuant 20 to section 84A.19: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,500,000 22 (a) From the moneys appropriated in this numbered 23 subparagraph, $3,883,000 shall be allocated pursuant to the 24 formula established in section 260C.18C. 25 (b) From the moneys appropriated in this numbered 26 subparagraph, not more than $150,000 shall be used by the 27 department of workforce development for implementation of adult 28 education and literacy programs pursuant to section 84A.19. 29 (c) From the moneys appropriated in this numbered 30 subparagraph, not more than $1,275,000 shall be distributed 31 as grants to community colleges for the purpose of adult 32 basic education programs for students requiring instruction 33 in English as a second language. The department of workforce 34 development shall establish an application process and criteria 35 -12- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 12/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ to award grants pursuant to this subparagraph division to 1 community colleges. The criteria shall be based on need for 2 instruction in English as a second language in the region 3 served by each community college as determined by factors 4 including data from the latest federal decennial census and 5 outreach efforts to determine regional needs. 6 (d) From the moneys appropriated in this numbered 7 subparagraph, $210,000 shall be transferred to the department 8 of health and human services for purposes of administering a 9 program to provide access to international resources to Iowans 10 and new Iowans to provide economic and leadership development 11 resulting in Iowa being a more welcoming place to live, work, 12 and raise a family. The program shall provide supplemental 13 support services for international refugees to improve 14 learning, English literacy, life skills, cultural competencies, 15 and integration in a county with a population over 350,000 16 as determined by the 2020 federal decennial census. The 17 department of health and human services shall utilize a request 18 for proposals process to identify the entity best qualified to 19 implement the program. 20 (3) For the funding of internships for students studying in 21 the fields of science, technology, engineering, and mathematics 22 with eligible Iowa employers as provided in section 84A.21, 23 subsection 2, paragraph âcâ: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 633,325 25 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 26 this section that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 27 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 28 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 29 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 30 Sec. 12. GENERAL FUND ââ CERTAIN REGENTS INSTITUTIONS. 31 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 32 to the following institutions for the fiscal year beginning 33 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, 34 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 35 -13- LSB 1011XG (6) 91 nls/ko 13/ 15 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ designated: 1 a. IOWA STATE UNIVERSITY OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY 2 In cooperation with the economic development authority, for 3 support of a biosciences innovation ecosystem, to strengthen 4 Iowaâs leadership positions in the area of bio-based chemicals, 5 digital agriculture, vaccines, and medical devices, including 6 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,963,995 8 b. STATE UNIVERSITY OF IOWA 9 In cooperation with the economic development authority, for 10 support of a biosciences innovation ecosystem, to strengthen 11 Iowaâs leadership positions in the area of bio-based chemicals, 12 digital agriculture, vaccines, and medical devices, including 13 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 15 c. UNIVERSITY OF NORTHERN IOWA 16 For equipment and technology to expand the universityâs 17 additive manufacturing capabilities related to investment 18 castings technology and industry support, including salaries, 19 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 394,321 21 The university of northern Iowa shall make a good-faith 22 effort to coordinate with private entities to seek moneys to 23 supplement this appropriation to support the expansion of the 24 universityâs additive manufacturing capabilities. 25 2. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 26 subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ and âbâ, that remain unencumbered 27 or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year shall not revert 28 but shall remain available for expenditure for the purposes 29 designated until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 30